test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-mâthâtan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - mâthâtan : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mâthâtan   # it is bad, it is evil

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-mâthâtahk   # as it is bad, as it is evil
      

      # Prs # Ind
      mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: mâthâtan   # it is bad, it is evil
      mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: mâthâtanithiw   # it over there is bad, it over there is evil
      mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: mâthâtanwa   # they are bad, they are evil
      mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: mâthâtanithiwa   # they over there are bad, they over there are evil
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-mâthâtahk   # as it is bad, as it is evil
      PV/î+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-mâthâtanithik   # as it over there is bad, as it over there is evil
      PV/î+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-mâthâtahki   # as they are bad, as they are evil
      PV/î+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-mâthâtanithiki   # as they over there are bad, as they over there are evil
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: kî-mâthâtan   # it was bad, it was evil
      PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: kî-mâthâtanithiw   # it over there was bad, it over there was evil
      PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: kî-mâthâtanwa   # they were bad, they were evil
      PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: kî-mâthâtanithiwa   # they over there were bad, they over there were evil
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-mâthâtahk   # as it was bad, as it was evil
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-kî-mâthâtanithik   # as it over there was bad, as it over there was evil
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-mâthâtahki   # as they were bad, as they were evil
      PV/î+PV/ki+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-kî-mâthâtanithiki   # as they over there were bad, as they over there were evil
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wî-mâthâtan   # it is going to be bad, it is going to be evil
      PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: wî-mâthâtanithiw   # it over there is going to be bad, it over there is going to be evil
      PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: wî-mâthâtanwa   # they are going to be bad, they are going to be evil
      PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: wî-mâthâtanithiwa   # they over there are going to be bad, they over there are going to be evil
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-mâthâtahk   # as it is going to be bad, as it is going to be evil
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-wî-mâthâtanithik   # as it over there is going to be bad, as it over there is going to be evil
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-mâthâtahki   # as they are going to be bad, as they are going to be evil
      PV/î+PV/wi+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-wî-mâthâtanithiki   # as they over there are going to be bad, as they over there are going to be evil
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Sg: ka-mâthâtan   # it will be bad, it will be evil
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Sg: ka-mâthâtanithiw   # it over there will be bad, it over there will be evil
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+3Pl: ka-mâthâtanwa   # they will be bad, they will be evil
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Ind+4Pl: ka-mâthâtanithiwa   # they over there will be bad, they over there will be evil
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ka-mâthâtahk   # it will be bad, it will be evil
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ka-mâthâtanithik   # it over there will be bad, it over there will be evil
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ka-mâthâtahki   # they will be bad, they will be evil
      PV/ka+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ka-mâthâtanithiki   # they over there will be bad, they over there will be evil
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ta-mâthâtahk   # it is bad, it is evil
      PV/ta+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ta-mâthâtanithik   # it over there is bad, it over there is evil
      PV/ta+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ta-mâthâtahki   # they are bad, they are evil
      PV/ta+mâthâtan+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ta-mâthâtanithiki   # they over there are bad, they over there are evil
      

      # Fut # Cond
      mâthâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâthâtahki   # when it is bad, when it is evil
      mâthâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: mâthâtanithiki   # when it over there is bad, when it over there is evil
      mâthâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâthâtahkwâwi   # when they are bad, when they are evil
      mâthâtan+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: mâthâtanithikwâwi   # when they over there are bad, when they over there are evil
      
